pt-PT: Textura do queijo: Quebradiço; Fresco; Duro; Processado; Semiduro; Semimacio; Macio; Para barrar; Outra
pl: Tekstura sera: Kruchy; Świeży; Twardy; Topiony; Półtwardy; Półmiękki; Miękki; Do smarowania; Inny
nl: Kaas textuur: Kruimelig; Vers; Hard; Bewerkt; Halfhard; Halfzacht; Zacht; Smeerbaar; Overig
th: เนื้อสัมผัสของชีส: ร่วน; สด; แข็ง; แปรรูป; กึ่งแข็ง; กึ่งนิ่ม; นิ่ม; ทาได้; อื่นๆ
cs: Textura sýru: Drobivý; Čerstvý; Tvrdý; Tavený; Polotvrdý; Poloměkký; Měkký; Roztíratelný; Jiná
vi: Kết cấu phô mai: Dễ vụn; Tươi; Cứng; Đã qua chế biến; Bán cứng; Bán mềm; Mềm; Có thể phết; Khác
nb: Ostetekstur: Smuldrete; Fersk; Hard; Smelteost; Halvhard; Halvmyk; Myk; Smørbar; Annet
ru: Текстура сыра: Рассыпчатый; Свежий; Твёрдый; Плавленый; Полутвёрдый; Полумягкий; Мягкий; Пастообразный; Другое
hr-HR: Tekstura sira: Mrvičasta; Svježa; Tvrda; Topljena; Polutvrda; Polumeka; Meka; Maziva; Ostalo
es: Textura del queso: Quebradizo; Fresco; Duro; Procesado; Semiduro; Semiblando; Blando; Untable; Otra
ro-RO: Textură de brânză: Fărâmicioasă; Proaspătă; Tare; Procesată; Semitare; Semimoale; Moale; Tartinabilă; Altele
fr: Texture du fromage: Friable; Frais; À pâte dure; Fondu; À pâte mi-dure; À pâte demi-ferme; À pâte molle; À tartiner; Autre
de: Textur des Käses: Bröckelig; Frisch; Hart; Schmelzkäse; Halbfest; Halbweich; Weich; Streichfähig; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 奶酪质地: 易碎; 新鲜; 硬质; 再制; 半硬质; 半软质; 软质; 易涂抹; 其他
sk-SK: Textúra syra: Drobivý; Čerstvý; Tvrdý; Tavený; Polotvrdý; Polomäkký; Mäkký; Roztierateľný; Iné
sl-SI: Tekstura sira: Drobljiva; Svež; Trdi; Topljeni; Poltrdi; Polmehki; Mehki; Mazavi; Drugo
hu: Sajt textúrája: Morzsalékos; Friss; Kemény; Ömlesztett; Félkemény; Félpuha; Lágy; Kenhető; Egyéb
fi: Juuston koostumus: Mureneva; Tuore; Kova; Sulate; Puolikova; Puolipehmeä; Pehmeä; Levitettävä; Muu
zh-TW: 乳酪質地: 易碎; 新鮮; 硬質; 加工; 半硬質; 半軟質; 軟質; 可塗抹; 其他
ko: 치즈 질감: 잘 부서짐; 프레시; 경질; 가공; 반경질; 반연질; 연질; 펴 바를 수 있음; 기타
sv: Ostkonsistens: Smulig; Färsk; Hård; Smältost; Halvhård; Halvmjuk; Mjuk; Bredbar; Övrigt
el: Υφή τυριού: Θρυμματιστή; Φρέσκο; Σκληρό; Επεξεργασμένο; Ημίσκληρο; Ημιμαλακό; Μαλακό; Που αλείφεται; Άλλο
ja: チーズの質感: ホロホロ; フレッシュ; ハード; プロセス; セミハード; セミソフト; ソフト; スプレッダブル; その他
en: Cheese texture: Crumbly; Fresh; Hard; Processed; Semi-hard; Semi-soft; Soft; Spreadable; Other
it: consistenza del formaggio: Friabile; Fresco; A pasta dura; Fuso; A pasta semidura; A pasta semimolle; A pasta molle; Spalmabile; Altro
da: Ostekonsistens: Smuldrende; Frisk; Hård; Smelteost; Halvhård; Halvblød; Blød; Smørbar; Andet
bg-BG: Текстура на сирене: Трошливо; Прясно; Твърдо; Топено; Полутвърдо; Полумеко; Меко; За мазане; Други
lt-LT: Sūrio tekstūra: Trupantis; Šviežias; Kietasis; Lydytas; Puskietis; Pusminkštis; Minkštasis; Tepamasis; Kita
tr: Peynir dokusu: Ufalanan; Taze; Sert; İşlenmiş; Yarı sert; Yarı yumuşak; Yumuşak; Sürülebilir; Diğer
pt-BR: Textura do queijo: Esfarelento; Fresco; Duro; Processado; Semiduro; Semimacio; Macio; Cremoso; Outra